South Dakota, session 2026, SB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $750,000 in other fund expenditure authority, from the
South Dakota water and environment fund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources,
for the purpose of providing a grant to local project sponsors for a feasibility-level study,
system startup, and administration of the Dakota Mainstem regional water system study.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 2. There is appropriated $500,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from the
South Dakota water and environment fund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources,
for the purpose of providing a grant to the Department of Agriculture and Natural
Resources for hydrology and water management studies to assess, model, and quantify
the state’s surface water and groundwater resources. The activities to be funded include
the development of a publicly accessible high-resolution map to delineate wetlands
throughout the state.
Notwithstanding § 46A-1-61, the board may provide the grant for up to one
hundred percent of the nonfederal share of expenditures for hydrology and water
management studies.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 3. There is appropriated $175,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from the
South Dakota water and environment fund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources,
for the purpose of providing a grant to local project sponsors for the feasibility-level study

26.381.12 2 37
update of the Big Sioux River flood control study of Watertown and its vicinity, to be
completed by the United States Army Corps of Engineers.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 4. There is appropriated $2,000,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from
the South Dakota water and environment fund, to the Board of Water and Natural
Resources, for the purpose of providing a grant to local project sponsors for the
engineering design, preconstruction activities, and construction of the facilities included in
the water investment in northern South Dakota project.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 5. There is appropriated $11,400,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from
the South Dakota water and environment fund, to the Board of Water and Natural
Resources, for the purpose of providing grants and loans to project sponsors under the
state consolidated water facilities construction program, established pursuant to § 46A-1-
63.1.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 6. There is appropriated $3,400,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from
the South Dakota water and environment fund, to the Board of Water and Natural
Resources, for the purpose of providing grants and loans to project sponsors under the
state solid waste management program, established pursuant to § 46A-1-83.
The Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources may use up to $250,000 of
the funds appropriated in this section to contract for the statewide cleanup of waste tires
and solid waste. Notwithstanding § 46A-1-61, the board may provide the grant for up to
one hundred percent of the nonfederal share of the expenditures for statewide waste tires
and solid waste cleanup projects.
Moneys must be provided according to the terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
SB37 ENROLLED

26.381.12 3 37
Section 7. There is appropriated $200,000 in other fund expenditure authority, from
administrative expense surcharge fees deposited in the state water pollution control
revolving fund program subfund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources, for the
purpose of providing water quality grants under the state water pollution control revolving
fund program, established pursuant to § 46A-1-60.1.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 8. There is appropriated $400,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from
administrative expense surcharge fees deposited in the state water pollution control
revolving fund program subfund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources, for the
purpose of contracting for the preparation of applications and the administration of clean
water state revolving fund loans under the state water pollution control revolving fund
program, established pursuant to § 46A-1-60.1.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 9. There is appropriated $400,000, in other fund expenditure authority, from
administrative expense surcharge fees deposited in the state drinking water revolving fund
program subfund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources, for the purpose of
contracting for the preparation of applications and the administration of drinking water
state revolving fund loans under the state drinking water revolving fund program,
established pursuant to § 46A-1-60.1.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 10. There is appropriated $250,000, in federal fund expenditure authority, for
federal moneys deposited in the state drinking water revolving fund program subfund, to
the Board of Water and Natural Resources, for the purpose of providing small system
technical assistance and local assistance set-aside grants, or contracts, to eligible entities
under the state drinking water revolving fund program, established pursuant to § 46A-1-
60.1.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
SB37 ENROLLED

26.381.12 4 37
Section 11. There is appropriated $50,000, in federal fund expenditure authority, for
federal moneys deposited in the state water pollution control revolving fund program
subfund, to the Board of Water and Natural Resources, for the purpose of providing small
system technical assistance set-aside grants, or contracts, to eligible entities under the
state water pollution control revolving fund program, established pursuant to § 46A-1-
60.1.
Moneys must be provided according to terms and conditions established by the
Board of Water and Natural Resources.
Section 12. The secretary of the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures
authorized in this Act.
Section 13. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 14. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall
be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
SB37 ENROLLED

26.381.12 5 37
An Act to make appropriations for water and environmental purposes and to declare an
emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 37
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 37 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB37 ENROLLED